ro-RO: Tip de flaut de cimpoi: Chanter cu capăt închis; Chanter cu clape; Chanter cu capăt deschis; Chanter de antrenament; Altele
fi: Melodiaputken tyyppi: Suljettupäinen melodiapilli; Läpällinen melodiapilli; Avopäinen melodiapilli; Harjoituspilli; Muu
ru: Тип чантера: Чантер закрытого типа; Чантер с клапанами; Чантер открытого типа; Тренировочный чантер; Другое
cs: Typ zpěvu: Uzavřený chanter; Klapkový chanter; Otevřený chanter; Cvičný chanter; Jiný
hr-HR: Vrsta sviraljke: Zatvorena prebiralica; Prebiralica s tipkama; Otvorena prebiralica; Prebiralica za vježbanje; Ostalo
bg-BG: Вид на ручилото: Гайдуница със затворен край; Гайдуница с клапи; Гайдуница с отворен край; Тренировъчна гайдуница; Други
de: Spielpfeifentyp: Spielpfeife mit geschlossenem Ende; Spielpfeife mit Klappen; Spielpfeife mit offenem Ende; Übungsspielpfeife; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Tipo de chanter: Ponteira fechada; Ponteira com chaves; Ponteira aberta; Ponteira de prática; Outro
ja: チャンタータイプ: クローズドエンドチャンター; キー付きチャンター; オープンエンドチャンター; プラクティスチャンター; その他
vi: Loại ống chanter: Sáo bịt đầu; Sáo có phím; Sáo hở đầu; Sáo tập; Khác
tr: Melodi borusu tipi: Kapalı uçlu kaval; Tuşlu kaval; Açık uçlu kaval; Egzersiz kavalı; Diğer
zh-TW: 旋律管類型: 閉口式旋律管; 按鍵式旋律管; 開口式旋律管; 練習用旋律管; 其他
da: Chantertype: Lukket chanter; Chanter med klapper; Åben chanter; Øve-chanter; Andet
sk-SK: Typ melodickej píšťaly: Uzavretá gajdica; Klávesová gajdica; Otvorená gajdica; Cvičná gajdica; Iné
hu: Dallamsíp típusa: Zárt végű dallamsíp; Billentyűs dallamsíp; Nyitott végű dallamsíp; Gyakorló dallamsíp; Egyéb
sv: Typ av chanter: Sluten spelpipa; Spelpipa med klaffar; Öppen spelpipa; Övningspipa; Övrigt
it: Tipo di chanter: Chanter a estremità chiusa; Chanter con chiavi; Chanter a estremità aperta; Chanter da pratica; Altro
nb: Type munnstykke: Melodipipe med lukket ende; Melodipipe med klaffer; Melodipipe med åpen ende; Øvingsmelodipipe; Annet
pt-BR: Tipo de ponteira: Ponteiro fechado; Ponteiro com chaves; Ponteiro aberto; Ponteiro de prática; Outro
fr: Sing-along version: Hautbois à extrémité fermée; Hautbois à clés; Hautbois à extrémité ouverte; Hautbois d’entraînement; Autre
ko: 찬터 유형: 폐쇄형 찬터; 키 찬터; 개방형 찬터; 연습용 찬터; 기타
es: Tipo de puntero: Puntero cerrado; Puntero con llaves; Puntero abierto; Puntero de práctica; Otro
sl-SI: Vrsta piščalke za dude: Zaprti tip melodijske piščali; Melodijska piščal s tipkami; Odprti tip melodijske piščali; Vadbena melodijska piščal; Drugo
th: ประเภทชานเตอร์: แชนเตอร์แบบปลายปิด; แชนเตอร์แบบมีคีย์; แชนเตอร์แบบปลายเปิด; แชนเตอร์สำหรับฝึกหัด; อื่นๆ
nl: Chantertype: Gesloten chanter; Chanter met kleppen; Open chanter; Oefenchanter; Overig
pl: Typ piszczałki: Przebierka zamknięta; Przebierka klapowa; Przebierka otwarta; Przebierka do ćwiczeń; Inna
el: Τύπος αυλού: Αυλός κλειστού άκρου; Αυλός με κλειδιά; Αυλός ανοιχτού άκρου; Αυλός εξάσκησης; Άλλο
zh-CN: 旋律管类型: 闭管主音管; 带键主音管; 开管主音管; 练习用主音管; 其他
en: Chanter type: Closed-ended chanter; Keyed chanter; Open-ended chanter; Practice chanter; Other
lt-LT: Dūdmaišio melodinio vamzdelio tipas: Uždaro galo melodinis vamzdelis; Melodinis vamzdelis su vožtuvais; Atviro galo melodinis vamzdelis; Mokomasis melodinis vamzdelis; Kita